Massachusetts, session 194th, H1714.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 28 of Chapter 208 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting at the end of the first paragraph the following:— When the court makes an
order or judgment for maintenance or support of a child or children hereunder, the court shall
determine whether childcare services are deemed necessary by the custodial parent and whether
the non-custodial parent is available and capable of providing all or part of said childcare. If the
court determines that the non-custodial parent is available, capable, and desirous of providing all
or part of said childcare for the child or children for whom support is ordered, the court shall
include in its order provisions allowing the non-custodial parent the right to provide such child
care. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to authorize entry by the non-custodial parent into
the home of the custodial parent for the purposes of childcare. A change in the availability of the
of 2

non-custodial parent to provide childcare shall constitute a material and substantial change in
circumstances for purposes of modification of existing judgments.
SECTION 2. Section 9 of Chapter 209C of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting at the end of subsection (a) the following:— When the court makes an
order or judgment for maintenance or support of a child or children, said court shall determine
whether day care services are deemed necessary by the custodial parent and whether the non-
custodial parent is available, capable, and desirous of providing all or part of said child care.
When the court has determined that the non-custodial parent is available, capable, and desirous
of providing child care for the child or children for whom support is ordered, the court shall
include in its orders provisions allowing the non-custodial parent the right to provide said child
care. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to authorize entry by the non-custodial parent into
the home of the custodial parent for the purposes of childcare. A change in the availability of the
non-custodial parent to provide childcare shall constitute a material and substantial change in
circumstances for purposes of modification of existing judgments. Ch. 208, sec. 28 refers to
support orders as part of divorce. Ch. 209C, see 9 refers to support orders for children born out
of wedlock.
of 2